Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 75 Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973
12-75-105. [Repealed.]

Each state office of emergency management and local office of emergency management and the officers of each state office of emergency management and local office of emergency management shall execute and enforce such orders and rules as may be made by the Governor under authority of this chapter.

Each state office of emergency management and local office of emergency management shall make available for inspection at its office all orders and rules made by the Governor or made under his or her authority.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “state office of emergency management and local office of emergency management” for “organization for emergency services” and for “thereof”; substituted “state office of emergency management and local office of emergency management” for “such organization” in (b); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “orders and rules” for “orders, rules, and regulations” in (a) and (b).

The General Assembly by concurrent resolution may terminate a state of disaster emergency at any time.

Thereupon, the Governor shall issue an executive order or proclamation ending the state of disaster emergency.

All executive orders or proclamations issued under this section shall indicate the nature of the disaster, the area or areas threatened, and the conditions which have brought it about or which make possible termination of the state of disaster emergency.

In the case of a disaster, each provider of utility services whose services were interrupted shall prepare a report describing:

The type of disaster emergency;

The duration of the disaster emergency, which includes the time the utility personnel is dispensed to the work site and returns to the personnel's point of origin; and

The personnel utilized in responding to the disaster emergency.

An executive order or proclamation shall be disseminated promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public and, unless the circumstances attendant upon the disaster prevent or impede, filed promptly with the Secretary of State.

An executive order or proclamation of a state of disaster emergency shall activate the disaster response and recovery aspects of the state, local, and interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans applicable to the political subdivision or area in question and be authority for the deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to this chapter or any other provision of law relating to disaster emergencies.

The amount of private property necessary to provide services;

The nature of labor and equipment to be used on the private property;

The estimated amount of time the private property will be used to provide services; and

The estimated amount of compensation the county will provide to the owner of the private property as a result of damage to the private property caused by the county.

Within sixty (60) days from the removal of county labor and equipment from the private property, the county shall compensate the owner of the private property for reasonable damage to the property.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment by No. 568 redesignated the former (b) as the present (b)(1); inserted (b)(2); and redesignated the former (c) as the present (c)(1) and (c)(2).

The 2001 amendment by No. 1278 substituted “sixty (60) days” for “seven (7) days” in (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment substituted “A declaration of a local disaster emergency” for “It” in (a)(3); and rewrote (c).

The 2013 amendment by No. 169 added “and to initiate emergency management functions under this subchapter” at the end of (b)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 973 added (d).

The Division of Emergency Management is established as a public safety agency of the State of Arkansas.

(1)The Division of Emergency Management shall have a Director of the Division of Emergency Management who is appointed by the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

(1)The division shall have such professional, technical, secretarial, and clerical employees and may make such expenditures within its appropriations or from any federal or other funds made available to it from any source whatsoever for the purpose of emergency services, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(1)There is created within the division an emergency reserve cadre to be composed of trained and available specialists to assist regular employees during declared disaster response and recovery operations.

Emergency reserve cadre personnel shall:

Be paid from disaster management funds or administrative funds, or both;

Be limited to salary, logistical, and travel expenses only; and

Not accrue ordinary leave, sick leave, or other employee benefits except for workers' compensation eligibility for injuries or death suffered in the line of duty.

Based on the size, impact, and magnitude of the disaster event, the director shall determine the minimum number of emergency reserve cadre personnel required to effectively supplement regular state emergency management personnel.

While in service described in subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section, the emergency reserve cadre personnel have the same immunities as regular state employees for good faith performance of their designated and assigned official duties under state sovereignty laws and practices.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1981, No. 45, § 10, provided, in part, that the Office of Emergency Services, which was established as a division of the Arkansas Department of Public Safety, and all its powers, functions, duties, personnel, and funds would be separated from the Department of Public Safety (abolished by Acts 1981, No. 45, § 1) and would thereafter function as a separate agency to be known as the Office of Emergency Services.

The section further provided that the act should not be construed to reduce any right that an employee of the Office of Emergency Services of the Arkansas Department of Public Safety would have under any civil service or merit system.

Acts 1999, No. 646, § 1, provided that:

“The State Office of Emergency Services shall hereafter be known as the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management. Any provisions of the Arkansas Code not corrected by this act shall be corrected by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to reflect the title ‘Arkansas Department of Emergency Management’ instead of ‘State Office of Emergency Services’ or any similar titles that now apply to the State Office of Emergency Services.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a); substituted “department” for “office” in (b) and (c); added (d); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment added (e).

The 2009 amendment, in (d), inserted “emergency” preceding “reserve cadre personnel” in (d)(2), substituted “Emergency reserve cadre” for “Qualified” in (d)(3)(A), for “Such” in (d)(3)(B), for “Such persons” in (d)(4)(A), and for “individuals so employed” in (d)(5), inserted “emergency” and “cadre” in (d)(4)(B), inserted “described in subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section” in (d)(5), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (d)(4)(A); and deleted “and report these numbers to the Governor for approval” at the end of (d)(4)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in the section heading and throughout the section; redesignated former (b) as (b)(1); substituted “Director of the Division of Emergency Management who is” for “director” in (b)(1); added (b)(2); inserted “secretary and the” in (c)(2); deleted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration“ following “Office of Personnel Management” in (c)(2) and in (d)(4)(A); and substituted “director” for “Director of the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (d)(2).

Cross References. Emergency Volunteer Reserve Act of 1995, §12-83-101 et seq.

Assistance to local officials in designing local emergency action plans;

Authorization and procedures for the erection or other construction of temporary works designed to protect against or mitigate danger, damage, or loss from flood, conflagration, or other disasters;

Preparation and distribution to appropriate state and local officials of state catalogues of federal, state, and private assistance programs;

Organization of personnel and the establishment of chains of command;

Coordination of federal, state, and local disaster activities;

Coordination of the state emergency operations plan with the operations plans of the federal government, including without limitation, the National Response Framework;

Establishment of the criteria and definitions for determining catastrophic losses suffered by both individuals and public entities and the enhanced levels of assistance to be provided upon the declaration of a catastrophic loss disaster; and

Other necessary matters.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment by No. 449 added current (a)(12); and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 646 substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” throughout the section; substituted “department” for “office” in (b)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “personnel” for “manpower” in (a)(9); substituted “the entities listed in subdivision (b)(1) of this section” for “these sources” in (b)(2); substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c); and made minor stylistic and punctuation changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1), (b)(2), and (c).

Personnel described in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall consult with political subdivisions, local offices of emergency management, and interjurisdictional offices of emergency management on a regularly scheduled basis and shall make field examinations of the area, circumstances, and conditions to which particular local and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans are intended to apply and may suggest or require revisions.

(1)The division shall administer and operate the Arkansas Wireless Information Network.

Employ personnel;

Manage, maintain, and acquire all equipment and assets;

Enter into contracts and lease agreements on behalf of the Arkansas Wireless Information Network; and

Administer the budget, expenditures, and all funding of the Arkansas Wireless Information Network.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 702, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Wireless Information Network to the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management.

“(a)The Arkansas Wireless Information Network is transferred to the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management.

“(b)All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting and purchasing of the Arkansas Wireless Information Network, are transferred to the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in the introductory paragraph of (a) and (b)(1); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment substituted “local offices of emergency management” and “offices of emergency management” for two instances of “disaster agencies” in (a)(6); and rewrote (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(11).

The 2019 amendment by No. 702 added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (b)(2)(A).

Amendments. The 1999 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2009 amendment inserted “of subsection (a) of this section” in (b), and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a) and (b).

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a).

The 2009 amendment substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services” or variant twice near the end of (a), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a).

The Division of Emergency Management shall operate and maintain information systems which will make available both voice and data links with federal agencies, other states, and state agencies as are assigned an emergency management role in the state emergency operations plan and local offices of emergency management.

In addition to the minimum requirements of subsection (a) of this section, additional information systems networks may be established as deemed necessary by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management.

Due to the time-critical nature of response to the scene of a disaster or major emergency occurrence, the Director of the Division of Emergency Management may designate appropriate vehicles as requested in the staffing patterns of the state offices of emergency management and local offices of emergency management and designate other state agency vehicles with an emergency management response requirement as emergency response vehicles.

Designated state and local government emergency response vehicles under this chapter shall share the same privileges and immunities regarding traffic laws and ordinances as other emergency vehicles as defined by state law.

Emergency vehicles authorized by this chapter shall be identified by a flashing light or rotating beacon which will be green in color.

When responding to an emergency, the designated emergency vehicle shall have flashing lights or rotating beacon activated and must be equipped with and operating a siren device.

The Governor is responsible for meeting and mitigating, to the maximum extent possible, dangers to the people and property of the state presented or threatened by disasters.

(1)Under this chapter, the Governor may issue executive orders, proclamations, and rules and amend or rescind them.

(1)There is created within the office of the Governor a disaster response fund, a disaster recovery fund, a catastrophic loss fund, and a hazard mitigation fund, which shall be separate and apart from the Governor's standard emergency fund.

The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) from the disaster recovery fund solely for use in individual assistance; and

The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) from the disaster recovery fund solely for use in public assistance.

The hazard mitigation fund shall be in the amount of three million dollars ($3,000,000), solely for use in hazard mitigation assistance.

The sum of three million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,250,000) from the catastrophic loss fund solely for use in catastrophic losses suffered by both individuals and public entities.

The Governor's disaster fund may be increased from time to time at the discretion of the Governor.

Expenditures from the individual assistance and public assistance funds may only be made in the event of a disaster as defined in §12-75-103 and only upon proclamation by the Governor.

Expenditures from the emergency response fund shall be made by executive order of the Governor, upon recommendation and verification by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management, and may only be made to defray immediate costs associated with response activities by emergency forces of state and local governments and private nonprofit forces duly registered in accordance with §12-75-129.

(A)Expenditures from the hazard mitigation fund shall be made by executive order of the Governor.

The director shall establish and maintain a current hazard vulnerability analysis of key critical public facilities eligible for assistance under the Governor's hazard mitigation fund.

(A)Expenditures from the catastrophic loss fund may only be made in the event of a federally declared disaster, as well as a disaster as defined in §12-75-103, and only upon a separate proclamation by the Governor that a disaster has occurred in which catastrophic losses have been suffered by individuals or public entities in the state, or both.

The director shall establish and maintain such criteria as are necessary to administer the funds authorized for catastrophic loss.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment by No. 449 rewrote (c)(2); substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (c)(5) and (c)(6)(B); added (c)(7); and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 646 rewrote (c)(2); and substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (c)(5) and (c)(6).

The 2001 amendment, in (c)(2), substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000)” for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)” in the introductory language and in (c)(2)(D), substituted “three million dollars ($3,000,000)” for “two million dollars ($2,000,000)” in the introductory language; substituted “two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000)” for “two million dollars ($2,000,000)” in (c)(2)(C); substituted “three million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,250,000)” for “four million dollars ($4,000,000)” in (c)(2)(E); and made stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2009 amendment substituted “§12-75-129” for “§12-75-127” in (c)(8); substituted “management” for “services” in (e)(3); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment deleted “firearms” preceding “explosives” in (e)(8).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(1) and (d)(2); and in (e)(1), substituted “orders or rules” for “orders, rules, or regulations” and substituted “order, or rule” for “order, rule, or regulation”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (c)(8).

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(3) and (b)(1); and made a stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment substituted “Studies under subdivision (a)(2) of this section shall” for “These studies will” in (a)(3), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c)(1) and (c)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(3); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1).

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” throughout (b) and (c); and inserted “such” in (b)(6).

The 2009 amendment, in (a), inserted “offices of emergency management” in (a)(1), and in (a)(2), inserted “described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section” and substituted “emergency management activities” for “emergency services activities”; in (b), rewrote the introductory language, which read: “It will be the responsibilities of this officer to”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(2) and (c); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1), (b)(2), and (b)(5).

(1)During the continuance of any state of disaster emergency, the Governor is Commander-in-Chief of all forces available for emergency duty.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the Governor by law, the Governor may:

(1)In addition to disaster prevention measures as included in the state, local, and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans, the Governor shall consider on a continuing basis steps that could be taken to prevent or reduce the harmful consequences of disasters.

(1)If the division believes, on the basis of the studies or other competent evidence, that an area is susceptible to a disaster of catastrophic proportions without adequate warning, that existing building standards and land use control in that area are inadequate and could add substantially to the magnitude of the disaster, and that changes in zoning regulations, other land use regulations, or building requirements are essential in order to further the purposes of this section, it shall specify the essential changes to the Governor.

(1)At the same time that the Governor makes his or her recommendations pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the Governor may suspend the standard or control which he or she finds to be inadequate to protect the public safety and by rule place a new standard or control in effect.

(1)It is the policy of this chapter that each department, commission, agency, or institution of state and local government actively and aggressively support the state offices of emergency management and local offices of emergency management to the end of providing the best possible preparation for response to or recovery from any emergency situation that may occur.

The agency emergency management liaison officer shall:

As conditions or situations may require or dictate, the Director of the Division of Emergency Management may request a state department, agency, or institution not currently participating in the emergency management liaison officer program to appoint an officer in accordance with this section.

Nothing in subsections (a)-(c) of this section shall be interpreted as relieving or otherwise abridging the responsibility and authority of agency directors in carrying out disaster operations for which their agencies are solely responsible.

(1)(A)By executive order, the Governor may combine two (2) or more established local offices of emergency management as an interjurisdictional office of emergency management.

Before a combination under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section, the jurisdictions involved shall prepare for the Governor's approval a written mutual interjurisdictional agreement that specifies how and by whom the emergency management coordinator shall be appointed.

The interjurisdictional agreement shall also include specific provisions addressing the funding, administration, staff, and operational control of the interjurisdictional office of emergency management.

The interjurisdictional office of emergency management shall meet the same minimum standards and requirements as a single-jurisdiction local office of emergency management in order to maintain eligibility for state and federal emergency management funding and program assistance.

A finding of the Governor pursuant to this subsection shall be based on an assessment conducted by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management using one (1) or more factors related to the difficulty of maintaining an efficient, effective, and economical system for disaster and emergency preparedness, mitigation, response, and recovery such as:

Small or sparse population;

Limitations on public financial resources severe enough to make maintenance of a separate established local office of emergency management unreasonably burdensome;

Unusual vulnerability to disasters and emergencies based on geographical, geological, hydrological, meteorological, or technological disaster potential; and

Other relevant conditions or circumstances.

(1)If the Governor finds that a vulnerable area lies only partly within this state and includes territory in another state or states and that it would be desirable to establish an interstate relationship, mutual aid, or an area organization for disaster, he or she shall take steps toward that end as may be desirable.

Any agreement, if sufficient authority for the making thereof does not otherwise exist, becomes effective only after its text has been communicated to the General Assembly and neither house of the General Assembly has disapproved it by adjournment of the next ensuing session competent to consider it or within thirty (30) days of its submission, whichever is longer.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in the introductory paragraph of (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted “under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section” in (a)(1)(B)(i), inserted “interjurisdictional” in (a)(1)(B)(i) and (a)(1)(B)(ii), inserted “local” and substituted “management” for “services” in (a)(1)(C), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in the introductory language of (a)(2).

(1)Each political subdivision within this state shall be within the jurisdiction of and served by the Division of Emergency Management and by a local office of emergency management or interjurisdictional office of emergency management.

(1)Each county within the state and those municipalities specifically designated by the Governor shall establish, fund, and maintain an established local office of emergency management or, as necessary, make arrangements through an interjurisdictional agreement to receive emergency management.

(1)The Governor shall determine if additional municipal local offices of emergency management or interjurisdictional offices of emergency management are required based on an assessment conducted by the Director of the Division of Emergency Management using one (1) or more of the factors enumerated in § 12-75-117(a).

The Governor may require a political subdivision to establish and maintain a local office of emergency management or an interjurisdictional office of emergency management jointly with one (1) or more contiguous political subdivisions if he or she finds that the establishment and maintenance of any agency or participation in an agency is made necessary by circumstances or conditions that make it unusually difficult to provide disaster or major emergency prevention, preparedness, response, or recovery services under other provisions of this chapter.

Each political subdivision that does not have a local office of emergency management and has not made arrangements to secure or participate in the emergency management of an agency shall have a liaison officer designated to facilitate the cooperation and protection of that political subdivision in the work of disaster and major emergency prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery.

(1)The chief executive of each political subdivision shall exercise comparable authority within his or her political subdivision, and within the limits of the Arkansas Constitution and laws of the state, as the Governor exercises over the state government during disasters and major emergencies. The chief executive shall ensure to the maximum extent possible, that his or her jurisdiction meets the minimum expected capability for disaster and emergency mitigation, planning, response, and recovery.

Each local office of emergency management and interjurisdictional office of emergency management shall prepare and keep current an emergency operations plan for its area.

The emergency operations plan and all annexes must be approved by the local office of emergency management of the political subdivision and receive concurrence of the chief executive of the political subdivision.

The emergency operations plan shall then be submitted to the division for approval prior to implementation.

The local office of emergency management or interjurisdictional office of emergency management, as the case may be, shall prepare a clear and complete statement of the emergency responsibilities of all local agencies and officials and of the disaster and major emergency chain of command. This statement shall be distributed to all appropriate officials in written form.

The county judge of each county and the chief executive of those municipal jurisdictions specifically designated as established local offices of emergency management shall appoint an emergency management coordinator for their respective local offices of emergency management.

The written mutual interjurisdictional agreement between the participating jurisdictions in an interjurisdictional office of emergency management, executed under § 12-75-117(a), shall govern the appointment of the emergency management coordinator of the interjurisdictional office of emergency management.

The emergency management coordinator shall act for and on behalf of the appropriate chief executive to manage and coordinate the functions, duties, and activities of the established local office of emergency management.

The emergency management coordinator and such supporting staff of an established local office of emergency management as may be employed in part, or in whole, by state and federal emergency management program funds, shall be responsible for meeting all standards and requirements stipulated for funding under the programs.

The director shall establish and periodically review criteria necessary to ensure compliance with minimum standards and requirements.

Failure to meet or maintain minimum standards and requirements or noncompliance with any part of this chapter by an established local office of emergency management may result in a decision by the director to reduce, withhold, or terminate partial or full funding for any or all local offices of emergency management programs in which the political subdivision participates or for which it may be otherwise eligible.

Local offices of emergency management shall operate and maintain as a minimum an information systems link with the division.

When authorized by the chief executive of the political subdivision and properly staffed, the local office of emergency management may operate a public safety communications center for the purposes of coordination, dispatch, and information services for local government public safety agencies and private or volunteer agencies with an emergency management mission.

The public safety communications center must be staffed by paid local office of emergency management public safety officers of the political subdivision and operate on a continuous basis if it is to serve as a law enforcement or fire dispatch and service center.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” throughout the section; in (a)(2), substituted “management” for “services” and “information” for “communication”; substituted “department” for “state office” in (f)(2); rewrote (j)(1); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section to clarify references to offices of emergency management.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(1) and (c)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(2), twice in (f)(2), in (g)(2)(B), and in (j)(1).

(1)All emergency jurisdictions shall participate in the statewide mutual aid system, except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section.

In order to make the election, the governing body of the emergency jurisdiction shall enact a resolution declaring that the emergency jurisdiction elects not to participate in the statewide mutual aid system.

The chief executive officer of the governing body shall provide a copy of the resolution to the Division of Emergency Management within ten (10) days of the enactment of the resolution.

Within its own emergency jurisdiction, a participating emergency jurisdiction shall:

Conduct joint training exercises with contiguous participating emergency jurisdictions at least one (1) time every other year;

Identify and inventory, at least annually, current services, equipment, supplies, personnel, and other resources related to planning, prevention, mitigation, and response and recovery activities of the participating emergency jurisdiction; and

Adopt and implement an incident management system consistent with Homeland Security Presidential Directive-5, as it existed on January 1, 2005.

To prevent, mitigate, or respond and recover from a local emergency declared under § 12-75-108; or

To conduct joint training exercises.

(A)A request for assistance may be made verbally or in writing.

Verbal requests shall be followed with written confirmation as soon as practical.

(A)A request for assistance is not required to be reported to the division in advance of or concurrent with the request.

However, a request for assistance shall be reported to the division in writing as soon as practical.

A participating emergency jurisdiction's obligation to provide assistance to another participating emergency jurisdiction with the prevention, mitigation, and response and recovery activities related to a declared emergency or training exercises is subject to the following conditions:

However, for the duration of the assistance, the emergency responder shall be under the operational control of the participating emergency jurisdiction requesting assistance in accordance with the incident management system of that participating emergency jurisdiction; and

(A)(i)Equipment and supplies belonging to a participating emergency jurisdiction responding to a request for assistance from another participating emergency jurisdiction shall remain under the command control of the responding participating emergency jurisdiction.

However, for the duration of the assistance, the equipment and supplies shall be under the operational control of the participating emergency jurisdiction requesting assistance in accordance with the incident management system of that participating emergency jurisdiction.

A participating emergency jurisdiction providing assistance may donate equipment, supplies, or any other kind of asset to another participating emergency jurisdiction.

If an emergency responder holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by a participating emergency jurisdiction or the state evidencing qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill and the assistance of the emergency responder is requested by a participating emergency jurisdiction, the emergency responder shall be deemed to be licensed, certified, or permitted in the participating emergency jurisdiction requesting assistance for the duration of the declared emergency or training exercises, subject to any limitations and conditions imposed by the chief executive officer of the governing body of the participating emergency jurisdiction receiving the assistance.

(1)(A)A participating emergency jurisdiction receiving assistance under the statewide mutual aid system shall reimburse a participating emergency jurisdiction responding to a request for assistance for all expenses associated with providing the assistance other than regular salaries and benefits.

A request for reimbursement shall be made in accordance with procedures developed by the Arkansas Homeland Security Advisory Group and adopted by the division as a rule under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The division shall not provide reimbursement for expenses associated with training exercises except in accordance with applicable rules.

(A)(i)If a participating emergency jurisdiction disagrees with another participating emergency jurisdiction regarding reimbursement, the participating emergency jurisdiction asserting the dispute shall notify in writing the chief executive officer of the governing body of the participating emergency jurisdiction with which the dispute exists.

The notification shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested.

The participating emergency jurisdictions involved in the dispute shall make every effort to resolve the dispute within thirty (30) days of receipt of the written notice by the noncomplaining participating emergency jurisdiction.

In the event that the dispute is not resolved within ninety (90) days of receipt of written notice of the dispute, either participating emergency jurisdiction may request binding arbitration.

Arbitration conducted under this subdivision (f)(2)(B) shall be conducted under the commercial arbitration rules of the American Arbitration Association, as in effect on January 1, 2005.

(1)An emergency responder who assists a participating emergency jurisdiction that is not the emergency responder's home emergency jurisdiction and who sustains injury or death in the course of, and arising out of, the emergency responder's employment is entitled to all applicable benefits normally available from the emergency responder's home emergency jurisdiction.

(1)All activities performed under this section are deemed to be governmental functions.

Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, neither the participating emergency jurisdiction providing assistance nor its employees shall be liable for the death of or injury to persons or for damage to property when complying or attempting to comply with the request of a participating emergency jurisdiction for assistance under the statewide mutual aid system.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The text of the Homeland Security Presidential Directive-5, referred to in subdivision (b)(5) of this section, can be found on the website of the United States Department of Homeland Security.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” for “State Office of Emergency Services” in (a)(1); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment added (f).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (a)(2)(C); and substituted “division” for “department” in (c)(3)(A), (c)(3)(B), (d)(3)(A), (f)(1)(B), and (f)(1)(C).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning mobile support units, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 197, § 14. The section was derived from Acts 1973, No. 511, § 9; 1977, No. 408, § 3; 1981, No. 891, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1942.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a participating emergency jurisdiction from entering into interjurisdictional agreements with one (1) or more other emergency jurisdictions or emergency services entities and shall not affect any other agreement to which an emergency jurisdiction may be a party.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the Governor and the chief executives or designees of the political subdivisions of the state are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies, and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof to the maximum extent practicable.

The officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies are directed to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor and to the emergency management organization of the state upon request.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 27; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1957; Acts 2009, No. 165, § 28; 2019, No. 315, § 965.